Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.574

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Collocation with affordable or supportive housing—State funding.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 90 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility. Eligible housing developments are projects that have received public funding and have secured enough funding to complete construction of the project that will result in a certificate of occupancy to open the affordable housing development, including the early learning facility.

[ 2024 c 230 s 2.]